Maine, session 132, LD176.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Establishment; membership. The Southern Penobscot County Regional
Ambulance Service Authority, referred to in this Act as "the authority," is established to
facilitate the provision of emergency medical services to the residents of towns in southern
Penobscot County that vote to join the authority, referred to in this Act as "the member
towns." Any town in southern Penobscot County may join the authority by a majority vote
of the municipal officers of the town.
For the purposes of this Act, "municipal officers" has the same meaning as in the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 2001, subsection 10.
Sec. 2. Board of directors. The authority is governed by a board of directors,
referred to in this Act as "the board." The board consists of one member from each member
town appointed by the municipal officers of that town.
The municipal officers of each member town shall appoint an alternate who may serve
in the absence of the appointed member for that town.
The members of the board are appointed for terms of 2 years, except that the first 3
members appointed are appointed for an initial term of 3 years and the 2nd 3 members
appointed are appointed for an initial term of one year. The members may be reappointed
at the pleasure of the appointing authority.
Sec. 3. Powers; funding. The authority may:
1. Make and enter into contracts and agreements and, pursuant to the bylaws of the
authority, purchase or lease all vehicles and equipment necessary to provide emergency
medical services to member towns;
2. Hold public hearings and sponsor public forums;
3. Sue and be sued in its own name;
4. Accept funds, grants and services from federal, state, county and municipal
governments, or any agency thereof, gifts and stipends from its member towns and private
gifts from individuals and entities;
5. Apply for and accept loans and allocate and disburse funds received to carry out the
purposes of the authority;
6. Require payment of funding from each member town on a per capita basis or based
on service call volume, as determined by the board. A member town through its governing
body may authorize a property tax levy to support the authority, with the levy amount based
on service needs;
7. Establish a schedule of fees for emergency medical services provided to individuals
who are not residents of a member town or for specific types of services not covered by
insurance;
8. Apply for and accept county, state or federal grants designated for emergency
medical services and shared service operations; and
9. Negotiate agreements with local hospitals or health care facilities to share costs for
high-demand services.
Page 1 - 132LR0377(01)

Debts of the authority authorized under this Act do not constitute or create any debt or
liability on behalf of the State. Debts incurred under this Act do not directly, indirectly or
contingently obligate the State to levy or to pledge any form of taxation or to make any
appropriation for their payment. This section may not be construed to prevent the authority
from pledging its full faith and credit to the payment of loans or other debts authorized
pursuant to this Act.
Sec. 4. Duties. The authority shall:
1. Employ or contract with licensed emergency medical services personnel as described
in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section 83, which may include employment of
technical or support staff as needed. All personnel must meet license requirements pursuant
to the Maine Emergency Medical Services Act of 1982, including initial training and
ongoing professional development;
2. Prioritize emergency medical services coverage within member towns, with
availability for mutual aid assistance to neighboring towns that are not member towns in
emergency cases as approved by the board;
3. Establish and enforce standards for ambulances, medical equipment and dispatch
operations, ensuring alignment with state emergency medical services laws and rules;
4. Provide an annual report to member towns, detailing service response times,
financial status and other relevant performance metrics;
5. Prepare an annual budget and require an annual audit, which must be made available
for public inspection;
6. Establish minimum annual training hours to ensure employed emergency medical
services personnel are up to date with the latest emergency medical services standards.
Salaries, benefits and employment conditions must be set by the board, ensuring
competitive rates to attract qualified personnel; and
7. Follow uniform standards provided in the Maine Revised Statutes insofar as they
relate to Department of Public Safety rules.
Sec. 5. Organization; conduct of business. The board must be organized and its
business must be conducted in accordance with the following.
1. The board shall elect a chair, vice-chair, secretary and treasurer from among its
members.
2. The secretary shall keep a record of the board's meetings. These records are public
records as defined in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 1, section 402, subsection 3.
3. The treasurer shall keep records of the board's transactions. These records are public
records as defined in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 1, section 402, subsection 3.
4. The treasurer must be bonded in an amount to be determined by the board.
5. A quorum of the board must be established in the bylaws of the authority and must
include the chair or vice-chair and the secretary or treasurer.
6. The board shall adopt such bylaws and mission statements as are necessary for the
legal operation and proper management of the authority. The board shall oversee service
Page 2 - 132LR0377(01)

411 operations, establish policies, approve budgets, set training requirements and manage
422 personnel.
7. Decisions must be made by majority vote of the board, with each member entitled
to one vote.
Sec. 6. Meetings. The bylaws must establish the annual meeting of the board.
Additional meetings may be scheduled at the call of the chair or at the written request of
any 4 members of the board.
A member who fails to attend board meetings 5 consecutive times may be replaced by
the municipal officers of the town the member represents. Notification of such absences
from the secretary of the board to the municipal officers is sufficient to trigger the
appointment of a replacement board member by the municipal officers.
Sec. 7. Member withdrawal. Any member town whose municipal officers by
majority vote opt to withdraw from the authority shall provide written notice to the board
at least one year prior to the proposed date of withdrawal. Upon receiving a withdrawal
request, the board shall evaluate the financial and operational impact of the withdrawal. If
the withdrawal is approved, the departing member town shall settle any outstanding
financial obligations to the authority by the withdrawal date.
A town that withdraws from the authority may rejoin the authority by a majority vote
of its municipal officers and acceptance by the board, subject to any reentry conditions the
board may require.